Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Assessment for Promotion of Sheep and Lamb Production Industry

247.6901.
Purpose.

It is declared to be in the interest of the public welfare that Kentucky farmers who are producers of ovine or caprine animals shall be permitted and encouraged to act jointly and in cooperation with all producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of ovine or caprine animals in promoting and stimulating, by utilization research, market maintenance and expansion, and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of ovine and caprine animals; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of ovine or caprine animals to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6904.
Definitions for KRS 247.6901 to 247.6957.

As used in KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture;

“Board” means the State Board of Agriculture;

“Producer” means every person who produces and markets ovine or caprine animals;

“New producer” means a producer who was not engaged in the business of producing ovine or caprine animals at the time a referendum was conducted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

;

“Marketing year” means from July 1 to June 30;

“Purchaser” means any person buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring the property in or to ovine or caprine animals from a producer, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the producer, when the actual or constructive possession of the ovine or caprine animals is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of a mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim;

“Marketed” means any quantities that are sold, bartered, or for which other items of value are exchanged;

“Net market price” means the sales price or other value received by a producer for ovine or caprine animals after adjustments have been made for any premium or discount based on grading or quality factors;

“Association” means any commission, council, board, or other body;

“Caprine” means of, or pertaining to, goats; and

“Ovine” means of, or pertaining to, sheep.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 2, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6907.
Activity not deemed restraint of trade.

No association meeting or activity undertaken to carry out the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

and intended to benefit all of the producers, handlers, dealers, and processors of ovine or caprine animals shall be deemed or considered illegal or in restraint of trade.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6911.
Referendum among producers of ovine or caprine animals on levying assessment in public interest.

It is declared to be in the public interest and highly advantageous to the agricultural economy of the state that producers of ovine or caprine animals shall be permitted by referendum to be held among the respective groups and subject to the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

to levy upon themselves an assessment on ovine or caprine animals and provide for the collection of the assessment for the purpose of financing or contributing toward the financing of a program of research, market development, and education to increase the domestic and foreign consumption, use, sale, and markets for ovine or caprine animals; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of ovine or caprine animals to market.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6914.
Application for assessment referendum.

Any existing association which is fairly representative of the ovine and caprine animal producers of Kentucky may at any time after July 15, 2008, make application to the State Board of Agriculture on forms prescribed by the board for certification and approval for the purpose of conducting a referendum among the producers of ovine or caprine animals upon the question of levying an assessment under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

and collecting and utilizing the assessment for the purpose stated in the referendum. The application forms shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Applicant’s name;

Applicant’s address;

Date;

Program to be undertaken for producers;

Brief statement of how the program is to be implemented;

Referendum to be conducted on a statewide basis;

Proposed effective date of the program; and

Signature of the applicant.

The Commissioner shall publish the application through the medium of the public press in the state within ten (10) days of receipt of this application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 5, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6917.
Certified association authorized to hold referendum.

Upon being certified by the Commissioner, the association shall be fully authorized to hold and conduct on the part of the producers of ovine or caprine animals a referendum on the question of whether or not the producers shall levy upon themselves an assessment under, and subject to, and for the purpose stated in KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

. The referendum shall be conducted on a statewide basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 6, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6921.
Referendum on statewide basis.

Any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

shall be held on a statewide basis. The referendum may be participated in by all ovine or caprine animal producers, including owners of farms on which ovine or caprine animals are produced, and tenants and sharecroppers sharing in the proceeds of ovine or caprine animals. In the referendum, individuals eligible for participation shall vote upon the question of whether or not there shall be levied an annual assessment in the amount set forth in the call for the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 7, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6924.
Supervision of referendum by Commissioner — Expenses.

The manner, conduct, and management of any referendum held under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

shall be under the supervision and direction of the Commissioner, and all expenses in connection with the referendum shall be borne by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 8, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6927.
Commissioner to determine date and other details of referendum.

With respect to any referendum conducted under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

, the Commissioner shall, before calling and announcing the referendum, fix, determine, and publicly announce at least thirty (30) days before the date determined for the referendum, the date, hours, and polling places for voting in the referendum, the effective date of the assessment, if adopted, the amount and basis of the assessment proposed to be collected, the means by which the assessment shall be collected if authorized by the producers, and the general purposes to which the amount collected shall be applied.

No annual assessment levied under the provisions of any referendum shall exceed one percent (1%) of the net marketed price per ovine or caprine animal marketed in the state during a marketing year by any producer included in the group to which the referendum was submitted or by any person subsequently becoming a new producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 9, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6931.
Rules of referendum prescribed by Commissioner — Notice — Limit of assessment.

The date, hours, voting places, rules, and administrative regulations for the referendum shall be established and determined by the Commissioner and shall be published by the Commissioner through the medium of the public press in the Commonwealth of Kentucky at least thirty (30) days before the holding of the referendum, and direct written notice of the referendum shall also be given to each county or area agent in any county covered by the referendum. The notice shall also contain a statement of the amount of the assessment proposed to be levied, which assessment in any event shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the net marketed price per ovine or caprine animal, and shall also state the method by which the assessment shall be collected and how the proceeds shall be administered and the purposes to which the proceeds shall be applied, which purposes shall be in keeping with the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 10, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6934.
Ballots — Canvass and declaration of result.

The Commissioner shall prepare and distribute in advance of the referendum all necessary ballots and shall arrange for the necessary poll holders for conducting the referendum. Within ten (10) days following the referendum, the Commissioner shall canvass and publicly declare the result of the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 11, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6937.
Effect of affirmative vote.

If, in the referendum called under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

, a majority of the eligible producers who vote in the referendum vote in the affirmative and in favor of levying and collecting the assessment proposed in the referendum, the assessment shall be collected in the manner determined and announced by the association conducting the referendum.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 12, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 12, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6941.
Notice of deduction required — Disposition of collections — Records.

If a majority of the eligible producers in the referendum who vote in the referendum vote in favor of the assessment, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, all persons engaged in the business of purchasing ovine or caprine animals in this state, that on and after the date specified in the letter, the specified assessment shall be deducted from the producer’s payment by the purchaser, or his agent or representative, from the net marketed price of the ovine or caprine animals.

The assessment shall, on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the end of the month in which the ovine or caprine animals are sold to the purchaser, be remitted by the purchaser to the duly certified association which conducted the referendum.

The books and records of all the purchasers of ovine or caprine animals shall at all times during regular business hours be open for inspection by the collection and compliance officer of the association which conducted the referendum, or the Commissioner or his duly authorized agents.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 13, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6944.
Kentucky Sheep and Goat Council.

There is hereby established the Kentucky Sheep and Goat Council composed of four (4) members appointed by the certified association, two (2) members appointed by the Kentucky Farm Bureau Federation, Inc., and one (1) member appointed by the Commissioner. These appointments shall be for terms of two (2) calendar years and each appointing body shall promptly file with the Commissioner the names of its respective appointees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 14, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6947.
Use of assessment funds.

The funds, including donations from individuals, concerns, corporations, and grants from the state or governmental agencies, shall be used for the purpose of promoting and stimulating, by research, market development, and education, the increased use and sale, domestic and foreign, of ovine or caprine animals; and for the prevention, modification, or elimination of trade barriers which obstruct the free flow of ovine or caprine animals to market. None of these funds shall be used to lobby as defined in KRS

6.611

. The duly certified association receiving the assessment funds shall, upon the advice and consent of the Kentucky Sheep and Goat Council, use and disburse the funds as follows:

The association may first refund to itself the costs and expenses incurred in the conduct of the referendum; and

The association may spend or disburse the necessary funds for administrative costs and expenses as determined by the Kentucky Sheep and Goat Council, with the balance remaining to be used for the purposes provided in this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 15, effective July 14, 1992; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 69, effective September 16, 1993; 2008, ch. 8, § 15, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6951.
Refunds.

If the referendum is carried in the affirmative and the assessment is levied and collected as provided, any producer upon and against whom the assessment has been levied and collected under the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

, if dissatisfied with the assessment and the result of the assessment, may demand of and receive from the treasurer of the certified association a refund of the assessment collected from the producer if the demand for refund is made in writing within thirty (30) days from the date on which the assessment is collected from the producer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 16, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 16, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6954.
Annual review of program — Termination.

The board shall review the assessment program annually. If, at the end of each marketing year after the first marketing year of the assessment program, the board determines that twenty percent (20%) of the producers assessed have indicated their dissatisfaction with the program by demanding a refund of the assessment collected from them, the Commissioner shall conduct a referendum among the producers. If, upon the referendum, a majority of the eligible producers who vote in the referendum reject the program, it shall be terminated at the end of the marketing year in which the referendum was conducted; otherwise, the assessment program shall continue.

If the duly certified association of ovine and caprine animal producers expresses in writing its desire to the Commissioner to discontinue the assessment program and terminate the program, the Commissioner shall within fifteen (15) days following receipt of the request convene the board to review and act on the request. The board, after reviewing the request and conducting whatever proceedings are deemed appropriate and necessary in connection with the request, may terminate the program effective at the end of the marketing year in which the board action is taken; and, in this event, the Commissioner shall notify, by certified mail, the purchasers of ovine and caprine animals affected by the termination of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 17, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 17, effective July 15, 2008.

247.6957.
Injunction against violations.

If, in the judgment of the board or the duly certified association, a purchaser has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of any of the provisions of KRS

247.6901

to

247.6957

, the board or the duly certified association may make application to the Franklin Circuit Court for an order enjoining the act or acts or practices, and obtain a restraining order and preliminary injunction against the purchaser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 347, § 18, effective July 14, 1992; 2008, ch. 8, § 18, effective July 15, 2008.